src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
1.:1.- ord_V ;
2:2-li	num_V_sub ;
3:3-ni	num_V_sub ;
4:4-ni	num_V_sub ;
5:5-ni	num_V_sub ;
6:6-ni	num_V_sub ;
7:7-ni	num_V_sub ;
8:8-ni	num_V_sub ;
9:9-ni	num_V_sub ;
2.+Err/Sub:2.-li	ord_V ;
3.+Err/Sub:3.-ni	ord_V ;
4.+Err/Sub:4.-ni	ord_V ;
5.+Err/Sub:5.-ni	ord_V ;
6.+Err/Sub:6.-ni	ord_V ;
7.+Err/Sub:7.-ni	ord_V ;
8.+Err/Sub:8.-ni	ord_V ;
9.+Err/Sub:9.-ni	ord_V ;
2.:2.-	ord_V ;
3.:3.-	ord_V ;
4.:4.-	ord_V ;
5.:5.-	ord_V ;
6.:6.-	ord_V ;
7.:7.-	ord_V ;
8.:8.-	ord_V ;
9.:9.-	ord_V ;
1:1-si	num_V_sub ;
2:2-si	num_V_sub ;
3:3-si  num_V_sub ;
4:4-si	num_V_sub ;
5:5-si	num_V_sub ;
6:6-si	num_V_sub ;
7:7-si	num_V_sub ;
8:8-si	num_V_sub ;
9:9-si	num_V_sub ;
